Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-276
Offstreet parking; sections; supplementary to existing law.

Sections 15-269 to 15-276 are supplementary to existing statutes relating to cities of the primary class and confer upon such cities powers not heretofore granted.

Laws 1967, c. 51, § 8, p. 188.